Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 75

Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-75-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1934.

12-75-102. Policy and purposes.

Because of the existing and increasing possibility of the occurrence of a major emergency or a disaster of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting from enemy attack, natural or human-caused catastrophes, or riots and civil disturbances and in order to ensure that this state will be prepared to deal with such contingencies in a timely, coordinated, and efficient manner and generally to provide for the common defense and protect the public peace, health, safety and preserve the lives and property of the state, it is found and declared to be necessary to:

Create from the present Office of Emergency Services and current adjunct offices the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management and authorize and direct the creation of comparable local organizations within the political subdivisions of the state;

Confer upon the Governor and upon the executive heads of the political subdivisions of the state the emergency powers provided herein;

Provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the political subdivisions of the state and with other states and to cooperate with the federal government with respect to carrying out emergency management functions;

Direct the establishment of emergency management liaison offices within each state department and agency with an emergency management role or responsibility; and

Provide for workers' compensation benefits for emergency management workers performing emergency management operations.

It is further declared to be the purpose of this chapter and the policy of the state to authorize and provide for a disaster management system embodying all aspects of predisaster preparedness and post-disaster response by requiring all:

State and local government offices to coordinate emergency management activities through the department in order to coordinate personnel, equipment, and resources for the most effective and economical use; and

Emergency management-related functions of this state be coordinated to the maximum extent with comparable functions of the federal government, including its various departments and agencies, with other states and localities, and with private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the state and national personnel, resources, and facilities for dealing with any disaster that may occur.

The protection of lives and property is the responsibility of all levels of government.

Except as noted in this chapter, county and municipal governments bear primary responsibility for initial actions and activities related to disaster preparedness, response, and recovery for the county and the municipalities in the county through their local offices of emergency management, with support from the department.

When events have exceeded, or will exceed, local government's ability to respond or recover without state assistance, the chief executive officer shall declare a local state of disaster or emergency as prescribed in this chapter to signify his or her intent to request resources of the state or federal government, or both.

Where time constraints are critical to the saving of lives and property, the local chief executive officer may verbally declare a local state of disaster or emergency to the Director of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, to be followed by a written declaration as soon as practicable.

Only upon such declaration may the resources of the state be provided, and then may the state request that the assistance and resources of the federal government be provided, unless and except where the magnitude of the disaster is of such severity that the functions of local government have ceased or the chief executive officer of the municipal or county government, or both, and his or her designated successor have become incapacitated.

Under such conditions the Governor may declare a state of disaster or emergency on behalf of the specified local jurisdiction and direct emergency functions until such time as local government is restored.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The reference in subdivision (a)(1) of this section to the “present Office of Emergency Services” is a reference to the former State Office of Emergency Services which was renamed the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management by Acts 1999, No. 646, § 1.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “from the present Office of Emergency Services and current adjunct offices the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “a State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1); rewrote (b)(1); and added (c) and (d).

The 2009 amendment substituted “management” for “service” in (a)(3) and twice in (a)(5); in (b)(2), substituted “management-related” for “service-related” and “personnel” for “manpower”; inserted “Except as noted in this chapter” in (c)(2); substituted “this chapter” for “this subchapter” in (d)(1)(A); and made related and stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 2; 1981, No. 891, § 1; 1985, No. 687, § 1; 1985, No. 978, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1935; Acts 1999, No. 646, §§ 4-6; 2007, No. 197, § 1; 2009, No. 165, §§ 15-19.

12-75-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Chief executive” means a head of government, the Governor, a county judge, and a mayor or city manager of incorporated places, dependent on the form and level of government;

“Disaster” means any tornado, storm, flood, high water, earthquake, drought, fire, radiological incident, air or surface-borne toxic or other hazardous material contamination, or other catastrophe, whether caused by natural forces, enemy attack, or any other means which:

In the determination of the Governor or the Director of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management or his or her designee is or threatens to be of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant state action or to require assistance by the state to supplement the efforts and available resources of local governments and relief organizations in alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused thereby, and with respect to which the chief executive of any political subdivision in which the disaster occurs or threatens to occur certifies the need for state assistance and gives assurance of the local government for alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering resulting from such disaster; or

Results in an interruption in the delivery of utility services when emergency declarations are required and when delays in obtaining an emergency declaration from the Governor or the director or his or her designee would hamper and delay restoration of utility service.

In those instances, the Governor or the director or his or her designee may make such emergency determination subsequent to the initiation of the restoration work;

“Emergency jurisdiction” means any one (1) of the seventy-five (75) counties or specified local offices of emergency management or interjurisdictional offices of emergency management in the state;

“Emergency management” means disaster or emergency preparedness, mitigation, response, recovery, and prevention by state and local governments other than functions for which military forces are primarily responsible to prevent, minimize, and repair injury and damage resulting from major emergencies or from disasters caused by enemy attack, domestic or foreign terrorist attacks, natural causes, human-made catastrophes, or civil disturbances.

These functions include, without limitation:

Fire fighting;

Law and order;

Medical and health;

Rescue;

Engineering;

Warning;

Communications;

Radiological, chemical, biological, or other special material identification, measurement, and decontamination;

Evacuation or relocation of persons from stricken areas;

Emergency social services such as housing, feeding, and locator services;

Emergency transportations;

Plant protection;

Damage assessment and evaluation;

Temporary restoration of public facilities;

Emergency restoration of publicly owned utilities, or privately owned utilities serving the public good;

Debris clearance;

Hazard vulnerability and capability analysis; and

Other functions related to the protection of the people and property of the state, together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparedness, mitigation, response, recovery, and prevention for all the functions in this subdivision (4)(B);

“Emergency management requirements” means specific actions, activities, and accomplishments required for funding of state offices of emergency management or established local offices of emergency management, or both, under applicable state and federal emergency management program guidance and regulations;

“Emergency management standards” means standards of training, education, and performance established by the director for employees of the state offices of emergency management and established local offices of emergency management designed to ensure competency and professionalism and to determine minimum qualifications for the receipt of federal or state emergency management funding, or both;

“Emergency responder” means any paid or volunteer person or entity:

With special skills, qualifications, training, knowledge, or experience in the public or private sectors that would be beneficial to an emergency jurisdiction in an emergency declared under § 12-75-108 or training exercises authorized by the United States Department of Homeland Security, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, or an emergency jurisdiction; and

Who is:

Requested by a participating emergency jurisdiction to respond or assist with a declared emergency or with authorized training exercises;

Authorized to respond or assist a participating emergency jurisdiction with a declared emergency or with authorized training exercises; or

Both requested and authorized to respond or assist a participating emergency jurisdiction with a declared emergency or with authorized training exercises.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1993, No. 1049, § 2, subdivision (9)(B) ended:

“as defined in PL 93-288, as amended by PL 100-707.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment by No. 913 substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” throughout the section; rewrote (1); deleted “occurring anywhere in the state” following “other means” in (2) and made minor punctuation changes; in (2)(A), substituted “In” for “in” at the beginning and inserted “or the Director of the” and “or his or her designee”; added (2)(B); added (23); and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 646 rewrote (1), (7), (13), (14), (18), and (20); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment inserted “offices of emergency management” following “state” in (5) and (6), deleted (B) and added present (7)(C); substituted “management” for “services” twice in (11)(B); added present (12); substituted “of” for “for” in present (13); inserted “offices of emergency management” in present (19)(B) and (20), and substituted “management” for “services” in present (19)(B); deleted former (20) and (22); and made minor stylistic changes.

City employee, who was a registered emergency services worker for the county and was killed at scene of brush fire, was not entitled to workers' compensation under §12-75-129 because no disaster or catastrophe existed as defined by this section. Office of Emergency Servs. v. Home Ins. Co., 2 Ark. App. 185, 618 S.W.2d 573 (1981).

An emergency responder may include, without limitation, the following types of personnel:

Law enforcement officers;

Firefighters;

Hazardous material response personnel;

Decontamination response personnel;

Certified bomb technicians;

Emergency medical services personnel;

Physicians;

Nurses;

Public health personnel;

Emergency management personnel;

Public works personnel;

Members of community emergency response teams;

Emergency personnel of nongovernmental organizations; and

Persons with specialized equipment operations skills or training or any other skills valuable to responding or assisting a participating emergency jurisdiction with a declared emergency or with authorized training exercises.

“Emergency responder” includes any full-time or part-time paid, volunteer, or auxiliary employee of the state, another state, a territory, a possession, the District of Columbia, the federal government, any neighboring country, or any political subdivision thereof, or of any agency or organization performing emergency management services at any place in this state subject to the order or control of, or pursuant to, a request of the state government or any political subdivision;

“Governing body” means a county quorum court, a city council, and a city board of directors;

(A)“Hazard mitigation assistance” means funds and programs to correct, alleviate, or eliminate a condition or situation which poses a threat to life, property, or public safety from the effects of a disaster.

Hazard mitigation assistance may include, but is not limited to, raising, replacing, removing, rerouting, or reconstructing existing public facilities such as roads, bridges, buildings, equipment, drainage systems, or other public or private nonprofit property, as defined in the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, 38 U.S.C. § 3720 and 42 U.S.C. § 5121 et seq.;

“Individual assistance” means funds and programs to provide for the immediate needs, including, but not limited to, food, clothing, and shelter for individuals and families;

(A)“Interjurisdictional agreement” means a mutual agreement between two (2) or more established local offices of emergency management that is approved by executive order of the Governor in accordance with this chapter to merge, integrate, or otherwise combine the functions of the respective established local offices of emergency management for more effective, economical, and efficient use of available personnel and resources.

An interjurisdictional agreement shall include specific provisions addressing the appointment, funding, administration, and operational control of the emergency management coordinator and staff of the interjurisdictional office of emergency management;

“Interjurisdictional office of emergency management” means an office of emergency management formed by two (2) or more local offices of emergency management under an interjurisdictional agreement;

“Local office of emergency management” means a county or municipal office of emergency management created and established in accordance with the provisions of this chapter to perform local emergency management functions within the existing political subdivisions of the state;

“Major emergency” means a condition which requires the activation of emergency response at the state or local levels, either in anticipation of a severe disaster such as an imminent enemy attack, potential civil disturbance, forecast major natural or human-caused disaster, or actual onset of conditions requiring the use of such forces which exceed the day-to-day response and activities of such forces and requires the coordinating of a complement of local, state, federal, or volunteer organizations;

(A)(i)“Operational control” means the assigning of missions and the exercising of immediate command and overall management of all resources committed by state or local government to a disaster operation or major emergency.

Unless otherwise delegated by executive order, the chief executive of the state or local governments, the director, or head of the local office of emergency management as the chief executive's direct representative will exercise operational control of the occurrence and assign missions.

Each agency, department, or organization will exercise control and authority over its personnel and resources to accomplish the assigned mission.

(i)Each agency, department, or organization will coordinate activities through the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management or local office of emergency management exercising operational control of the occurrence.

Operational control does not imply, nor is it intended to include, administrative management, which will remain with the parent organization;

“Participating emergency jurisdiction” means an emergency jurisdiction participating in the statewide mutual aid system established in §12-75-119;

“Political subdivision” means all duly formed and constituted governing bodies created and established under the authority of the Arkansas Constitution and laws of this state;

“Public assistance” means funds and programs to make emergency repairs or restoration of public facilities, to include, but not be limited to, publicly owned or maintained facilities such as roads, streets, bridges, utilities, schools, and other structures and facilities;

(A)“Public safety agency” means an agency of the State of Arkansas or a functional division of a political subdivision that provides firefighting and rescue, natural or human-caused disaster or major emergency response, law enforcement, and ambulance or emergency medical services.

State offices of emergency management and local offices of emergency management are considered in the context and definition of public safety agencies for performance or coordination of functions defined as emergency management to the extent necessary for mitigation of, planning for, response to, and recovery from disasters or major emergencies;

“Public safety officer” means those positions of state offices of emergency management and local offices of emergency management approved by the director in state and local staffing patterns and authorized by him or her to perform or coordinate emergency management functions to the extent necessary for mitigation of, planning for, response to, recovery from, or prevention of disasters or major emergencies within limitations of this chapter;

“Response assistance” means funds to defray the costs of response to an emergency that does not necessarily result in a disaster of the magnitude and scope described in this section, but which requires the deployment and utilization of state and local government and private emergency personnel, equipment, and resources to protect and preserve lives and property and for the welfare of the citizens of Arkansas; and

“Utility services” means the transmission of communications or the transmission, distribution, or delivery of electricity, water, or natural gas for public use.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 3; 1985, No. 629, § 1; 1985, No. 687, § 2; 1985, No. 978, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1936; Acts 1993, No. 1049, §§ 1, 2; 1995, No. 116, § 1; 1999, No. 646, §§ 7-11; 1999, No. 913, § 1; 2005, No. 1179, § 1; 2007, No. 197, § 2; 2009, No. 165, §§ 20-27.

12-75-104. Scope of chapter — Limitations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:

Interfere with the course or conduct of a labor dispute, except that actions otherwise authorized by this chapter or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health and safety;

Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs.

However, any communications facility or organization, including, but not limited to, radio and television stations, wire services, and newspapers may be required to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with a disaster emergency;

Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of units of the United States Armed Forces or of any personnel thereof, when on active duty, or the day-to-day operations of law enforcement agencies or firefighting forces.

However, state, local, and interjurisdictional disaster or emergency operations plans shall place emphasis upon maximum utilization of forces available for performance of functions related to disaster and major emergency occurrences; or

Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the Governor to proclaim martial law or of the Governor or chief executive of a political subdivision to exercise any other powers vested in him or her under the Arkansas Constitution or statutes or common law of this state independent of, or in conjunction with, any provision of this chapter.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning status of civil defense employees, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 197, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 511, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1956; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 12.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 4; 1985, No. 687, § 3; 1985, No. 978, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1937.